Rhode Island, session 2025, HB6298.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Pursuant to the request of the Warwick City Council by resolution adopted
on April 22, 2025, Article 2, Section 10, of the Warwick City Charter, is hereby amended to read
as follows:
Article 2, Section 10 - CITY COUNCIL – Notice of special meetings.
Notice of a special meeting shall be served in person upon, electronically, or left at the
usual place of residence of each member of the council and the mayor at least 48 hours previous to
the time of such meeting. The council may meet upon shorter notice at times of emergency.
SECTION 2. Pursuant to the request of the Warwick City Council by resolution adopted
on April 22, 2025, Article 6, Section 12, of the Warwick City Charter, is hereby amended to read
as follows:
Article 6, Section 12 -- DEPARTMENT OF FINANCE -- Purchases in excess of $1,000.
Small Purchases.
All purchases and contracts in excess of one thousand ($1,000) dollars and not exceeding
twenty-five hundred ($2,500) dollars, or such other amounts as may be prescribed by ordinance
and allowed by the state, shall be awarded by the purchasing agent to the lowest responsible bidder
after such public notice and competition as may be prescribed by council ordinance. The purchasing
agent shall have the right to reject any or all bids and advertise for new bids. A series of orders for

the same project shall be construed to be one order or contract and the finance department shall
disapprove the same as circumventing the requirements of this Charter for competitive bidding.
The acceptance of any bid for a contract in excess of twenty-five hundred ($2,500) dollars or such
other amounts as may be prescribed by ordinance and allowed by the state, shall be subject to the
approval of the city council and shall be awarded to the lowest responsible bidder. Alterations in
any contract may be made when authorized by the council upon the recommendation of the mayor.
SECTION 3. Pursuant to the request of the Warwick City Council by resolution adopted
on April 22, 2025, Article 10, Section 24, of the Warwick City Charter, is hereby amended to read
as follows:
Article 10, Section 24 -- GENERAL PROVISIONS: SUCCESSION IN GOVERNMENT
-- Minority Representation.
The city council shall establish via ordinance standards for minority representation
appointments to city boards and commissions.
There shall be minority party representation on all boards and commissions. The minority
party shall mean the party other than that of the mayor. The mayor shall make such minority party
appointment from a list of five names submitted by the chairman of the city committee of the
minority party at least five days before such appointment is to be made; provided, however, if the
chairman of such city committee shall fail or refuse to submit a list as aforesaid, the mayor shall
appoint any person known by him to be a member of the political party entitled to said appointment.
Unless otherwise established, all terms expire on the fifteenth day of the last month of the term,
unless that day falls on a non-business day, then the term shall expire on the first business day after
the fifteenth.
SECTION 4. Pursuant to Article 10, Section 29 of the Warwick City Charter, these
amendments shall be submitted to the voters of the city at the next general election to be held in
November, 2026, or a special election as may be scheduled sooner, for approval or rejection thereof,
in the following form:
"1. Shall the methods of notifying city council members of special meetings be expanded
from service in person or at their residence to include electronic notification?
APPROVE DISAPPROVE
2. Shall the monetary thresholds for competitive bids of small purchases that may be
awarded by the purchasing agent and by the city council be adjustable by ordinance as allowed by
the state?
APPROVE DISAPPROVE
3. Shall the city council establish via ordinance standards for minority representation
LC002803 - Page 2 of 4

appointments to city boards and commissions?
APPROVE DISAPPROVE"
SECTION 5. Sections 4 and 5 of this act shall take effect upon passage. Section 1 of this
act shall take effect upon approval of the voters of the city of Warwick at a general or special
election of amendment question 1 contained in Section 4. Section 2 of this act shall take effect upon
approval of the voters of the city of Warwick at a general or special election of amendment question
2 contained in Section 4. Section 3 of this act shall take effect upon approval of the voters of the
city of Warwick at a general or special election of amendment question 3 contained in Section 4.
========
LC002803
========
LC002803 - Page 3 of 4